Indiana, session 2026, HB1081.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-10-11.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 11.3. Hoosier Scam Prevention Board
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "board" refers to the Hoosier
scam prevention board established by this chapter.
Sec. 2. (a) The Hoosier scam prevention board is established
under the executive branch of state government as a continuing
board.
(b) The purpose of the board is to:
(1) collect information on the existence, use, and success of
educational materials and programs for consumers, retailers,
financial services companies, and wire transfer companies,
which:
(A) may be used as a guide to educate seniors, consumers,
employers, and employees on how to identify and prevent
scams that affect citizens of Indiana; and
2026 IN 1081—LS 6312/DI 154


(B) include:
(i) useful information for seniors, consumers, retailers,
financial services companies, and wire transfer
companies for the purpose described in clause (A);
(ii) training for seniors, consumers, employers, and
employees on ways to identify and prevent scams;
(iii) best practices for keeping seniors, consumers,
employers, and employees up to date on current scams;
(iv) the most effective signage and placement in retail
locations to warn citizens of Indiana about scammers'
use of gift cards, prepaid cards, and wire transfer
services to carry out a scam;
(v) suggestions on effective collaborative community
education campaigns;
(vi) available technology to assist in identifying possible
scams at the point of sale; and
(vii) other information that would be helpful to seniors,
consumers, employers, employees, retailers, wire
transfer companies, financial services companies, and
their employees as they work to prevent fraud;
(2) identify inadequacies, omissions, or deficiencies in the
educational materials and programs described in subdivision
(1) and their execution in reaching seniors, consumers,
employers, and employees to protect citizens of Indiana; and
(3) create:
(A) model materials;
(B) best practices guidance; or
(C) recommendations;
to address the inadequacies, omissions, or deficiencies
described in subdivision (2) that may be used by industries
and others to help protect citizens of Indiana from scams.
(c) Any:
(1) materials created by the board; or
(2) findings made by the board;
under subsection (b) shall be posted on the attorney general's
website.
Sec. 3. (a) The board consists of the following fifteen (15) voting
members:
(1) The attorney general, or the attorney general's designee.
(2) One (1) representative from each of the following:
(A) AARP, formerly known as the American Association
of Retired Persons.
2026 IN 1081—LS 6312/DI 154


(B) The Indiana Association of Area Agencies on Aging.
(C) The department of insurance.
(D) The state Medicaid fraud control unit.
(E) The state police department.
(F) The adult protective services unit.
(G) The Indiana Minority Health Coalition.
(H) CICOA Aging and In-Home Solutions.
(I) The department of financial institutions.
(J) The long term care ombudsman.
(K) The consumer protection division of the office of the
attorney general.
(L) The division.
(3) Two (2) representatives from consumer advocacy groups
or charitable organizations.
(b) The members of the board designated under subsection
(a)(2) and (a)(3) shall be appointed by the governor for terms of
two (2) years ending on June 30 of an even-numbered year.
Sec. 4. (a) The governor shall appoint a chairperson of the board
from among its membership.
(b) The chairperson's term shall last two (2) years.
(c) The chairperson serves at the will of the governor and may
be reappointed to additional terms.
Sec. 5. A vacancy on the board shall be filled by the appointing
authority to meet the same qualifications as the vacating member
and to fill the remainder of the vacating member's term.
Sec. 6. The board shall meet at the call of the chairperson at
least one (1) time annually.
Sec. 7. Eight (8) members of the board constitute a quorum.
Sec. 8. The division shall provide staff services for the board.
Sec. 9. The expenses of the board shall be paid from the state
general fund.
Sec. 10. Each member of the board who is not a state employee
is not entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is, however, entitled to
reimbursement for mileage and traveling expenses as provided
under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in
connection with the member's duties as provided in the state
policies and procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
Sec. 11. Each member of the board who is a state employee is
entitled to reimbursement for mileage and traveling expenses as
provided under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred
2026 IN 1081—LS 6312/DI 154


in connection with the member's duties as provided in the state
policies and procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
Sec. 12. The affirmative votes of a majority of the voting
members appointed to the board are required for the board to take
action on any measure, including reports prepared at the request
of the attorney general or the division.
2026 IN 1081—LS 6312/DI 154